apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="access__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which add -es">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bab/y__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -y and add -ies or directly add -s (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ies'</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ys'</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="analys/is__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -is and add -es">
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="maxim/um__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -um and add -a or directly add -s (LR)">
      <p>
        <l>um</l> 
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <!-- <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ums</l> 
        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> -->

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mon/ey__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which add -s or remove -y and add -ies (LR)">
      <p>
        <l>ey</l> 
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eys</l> 
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ies</l> 
        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/an__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -man and add -men">
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l> 
        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bass__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which end in -ss and add -es or nothing (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bus__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which end in -s and add -es or -ses (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ses'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="politics__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns that remain the same in plural">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wol/f__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -f and add -ves or -s(EEUU; LR)">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ves</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ves'</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fs</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="li/fe__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns that remove -fe and add -ves">
      <p>
        <l>fe</l> 
        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ves</l> 
        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/erson__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -erson and add eople or directly add -s (LR; formal/legal English mainly)">
      <p>
        <l>erson</l> 
        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eople</l> 
        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ersons</l> 
        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="staff__n">
    <e c="CP: singular spelling">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e c="CP: plural spelling: invariable singular form">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR" c="CP: alternative plural spelling (not very common): add -s">
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="child__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e c="CP: add -ren (noun with irregular plural)">
      <p>
        <l>ren</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ouse__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ouse</l> 
        <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e c="CP: add -ice (noun with irregular plural)">
      <p>
        <l>ice</l> 
        <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/oot__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oot</l> 
        <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e c="CP: add -eet (noun with irregular plural)">
      <p>
        <l>eet</l> 
        <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR" c="CP: alternative plural form, not very frequent (same form as singular)">
      <p>
        <l>oot</l> 
        <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="br/other__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>other</l> 
        <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR" c="CP: add -ethren (alternative plural form; irregular)">
      <p>
        <l>ethren</l> 
        <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e c="CP: add -others (regular plural form)">
      <p>
        <l>others</l> 
        <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stimul/us__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns that remove -us and add -i (normally applied to words of Latin origin), or remain the same (LR)">
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="acoustics">
        <i>acoustics</i> 
        <par n="politics__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="bacterium">
        <i>bacteri</i> 
        <par n="maxim/um__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="booty">
        <i>boot</i> 
        <par n="bab/y__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="box">
        <i>box</i> 
        <par n="bass__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="brother">
        <i>br</i> 
        <par n="br/other__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="bus">
        <i>bus</i> 
        <par n="bus__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="chassis">
        <i>chass</i> 
        <par n="analys/is__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="child">
        <i>child</i> 
        <par n="child__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="church">
        <i>church</i> 
        <par n="access__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="person, people">
        <i>p</i>
        <par n="p/erson__n"/>
    </e>
<e lm="colloquium">
        <i>colloqui</i> 
        <par n="maxim/um__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="crematory">
        <i>cremator</i> 
        <par n="bab/y__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="crewman">
        <i>crewm</i> 
        <par n="m/an__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="data">
        <i>data</i> 
        <par n="politics__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="editorial staff">
        <i>editorial<b/>staff</i> 
        <par n="staff__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="foot">
        <i>f</i> 
        <par n="f/oot__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fetus">
        <i>fetus</i> 
        <par n="access__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fish">
        <i>fish</i> 
        <par n="bass__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="genius">
        <i>geni</i> 
        <par n="stimul/us__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="grandchild">
        <i>grandchild</i> 
        <par n="child__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="hepatitis">
        <i>hepatit</i> 
        <par n="analys/is__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="inch">
        <i>inch</i> 
        <par n="access__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="insecurity">
        <i>insecurit</i> 
        <par n="bab/y__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="insignia">
        <i>insignia</i> 
        <par n="staff__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="knife">
        <i>kni</i> 
        <par n="li/fe__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="leaf">
        <i>lea</i> 
        <par n="wol/f__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="lens">
        <i>lens</i> 
        <par n="politics__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="life">
        <i>li</i> 
        <par n="li/fe__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="mouse">
        <i>m</i> 
        <par n="m/ouse__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="man">
        <i>m</i> 
        <par n="m/an__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="maximum">
        <i>maxim</i> 
        <par n="maxim/um__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="metropolis">
        <i>metropol</i> 
        <par n="analys/is__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="midwife">
        <i>midwi</i> 
        <par n="li/fe__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="minimum">
        <i>minim</i> 
        <par n="maxim/um__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="pancreas">
        <i>pancreas</i> 
        <par n="politics__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="postbox">
	    <i>postbox</i> 
	    <par n="bass__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="prognosis">
        <i>prognos</i> 
        <par n="analys/is__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="publicity">
        <i>publicit</i> 
        <par n="bab/y__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="push">
        <i>push</i> 
        <par n="access__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="shelf">
        <i>shel</i> 
        <par n="wol/f__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="species">
        <i>species</i> 
        <par n="politics__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="spokesman">
        <i>spokesm</i> 
        <par n="m/an__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="staff">
        <i>staff</i> 
        <par n="staff__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="statesman">
        <i>statesm</i> 
        <par n="m/an__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="thief">
        <i>thie</i> 
        <par n="wol/f__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="thrombosis">
        <i>thrombos</i> 
        <par n="analys/is__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="handkerchief">
        <i>handkerchie</i> 
        <par n="wol/f__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="tuna">
        <i>tuna</i> 
        <par n="staff__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="money"><i>mon</i><par n="mon/ey__n"/></e>
<e lm="wife">
        <i>wi</i> 
        <par n="li/fe__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Orthodox">
        <i>Orthodox</i> 
        <par n="bass__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="sustainability">
        <i>sustainabilit</i> 
        <par n="bab/y__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="abscess">
        <i>abscess</i> 
        <par n="access__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="madman">
        <i>madm</i> 
        <par n="m/an__n"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="behalf">
	    <i>behal</i> 
	    <par n="wol/f__n"/> 
    </e>
